Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 43 Cabinet-Level Departments of the Executive Branch
25-43-1202. State entities transferred to Department of the Military.

The administrative functions of the following state entities are transferred to the Department of the Military by a cabinet-level department transfer:

The Bureau of War Records, created under § 12-61-123; and

The State Military Department, created under Acts 1929, No. 85, and established as an independent agency by Acts 1981, No. 45, § 4, now to be known as the “Department of the Military”.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a cabinet-level department transfer under subsection (a) of this section includes all state entities under a state entity transferred to the Department of the Military under subsection (a) of this section, including without limitation a division, office, program, or other unit of a state entity transferred to the Department of the Military under subsection (a) of this section.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a state entity whose administrative functions have been transferred to the Department of the Military under subsection (a) of this section shall otherwise continue to exercise the duties of the state entity under the administration of the cabinet-level Department of the Military in the same manner as before the creation of the cabinet-level department.

The secretary may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to various divisions or employees of the department as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the department.

The secretary may, unless otherwise provided by law:

Hire department personnel;

Perform or assign duties assigned to the department; and

Serve as the director or the administrative or executive head of any state entity under the administrative control of the department if the secretary also meets all statutory requirements for the position.

The secretary shall also be the Adjutant General and shall meet all of the qualifications to hold that position.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2020, No. 18, § 31, provided: “SHARED SERVICES.

“(a)(1)(A)The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal services and operating expenses by the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.

“(B)Upon prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council, or if meeting in Legislative Session the Joint Budget Committee, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account appropriation section of this act and the transfer of positions to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

“(2)The transfer authority provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section for efficiencies and to eliminate duplication of services are limited only to those services that are provided for multiple divisions of a department, including without limitation to administration, human resources, procurement, communications, fleet operations, and information services.

“(3)The transfer authority provided to the department in subdivision (a)(1) of this section may be used to make transfers only within the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts authorized for the department.

“(b)(1)Each department utilizing the Shared Services Paying Account section or Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act shall submit a report to be included in the Budget Manuals for hearings, conducted by the General Assembly, listing all shared services transfers of positions, funds, and appropriation under this section, which shall be submitted as instructed by the Department of Finance and Administration — Office of Budget for uniformity.

“(2)A report submitted under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall include the following:

“(A)The position number, authorized position title, class code, grade, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the position being transferred to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act; and

“(B)The fund center, appropriation, appropriation amount, commitment item or items, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the fund or appropriation being transferred to the Shared Services Paying Account.

“(c)(1)It is the intent of the Ninety-Second General Assembly that the authority under this section to transfer positions is intended for use for the time period prior to Fiscal Year 2022 to allow cabinet-level departments to establish a centralized Regular Salaries — Shared Services section, with the recommendation that the position transfer authority granted under this section be discontinued after that time.

“(2)The Bureau of Legislative Research shall bring the recommendation in subdivision (c)(1) of this section to the attention of the chairs conducting the 2021 Regular Session pre-session budget hearings, the chairs of the Special Language Subcommittee, and the members of the Special Language Subcommittee during pre-session budget hearings.

“(d)Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a cabinet-level department each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by delineating the maximums in the appropriation act or acts and establishing authorized positions and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the cabinet-level departments created under Acts 2019, No. 910, may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided as authorized under this section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“(e)The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the date of passage through June 30, 2021”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5528.

25-43-1203. Secretary of the Department of the Military.

The executive head of the Department of the Military is the Secretary of the Department of the Military.

The secretary shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

Each division of the department shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the secretary.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5528.

Subchapter 13

— Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism

25-43-1301. Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.

There is created the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism as a cabinet-level department.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5549.

25-43-1302. State entities transferred to Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.

The administrative functions of the following state entities are transferred to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism by a cabinet-level transfer:

The Advisory Council of the Arkansas Arts Council, created under § 13-8-103;

The Arkansas Arts Council, created under § 13-8-103;

The Arkansas Historic Preservation Program, created under § 13-7-106;

The Arkansas History Commission, created under § 13-3-102;

The Arkansas Natural and Cultural Heritage Advisory Committee, created under § 25-3-104;

The Arkansas Natural and Cultural Resources Council, created under § 15-12-101;

The Arkansas Natural Heritage Commission, created under § 15-20-304;

The Arkansas Post Museum, created under § 13-5-601;

The Arkansas State Archives, created under § 13-3-101;

The Black History Commission of Arkansas, created under § 13-3-201;

The Capitol Zoning District Commission, created under § 22-3-303;

The Delta Cultural Center Policy Advisory Board, created under § 13-5-704;

The Department of Arkansas Heritage, created under § 25-3-102, now to be known as the “Division of Arkansas Heritage”;

The Department of Parks and Tourism, created under § 25-13-101 [repealed], now to be known as the “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism”, created under § 25-43-1301, the State Parks Division, created under § 25-43-1304, and the Tourism Division, created under § 25-43-1305, as provided under the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019;

The Great River Road Division, created under § 25-13-102;

The Historic Arkansas Museum Commission, created under § 13-7-302;

The Keep Arkansas Beautiful Commission, created under § 15-11-601;

The Mosaic Templars of America Center for African-American Culture and Business Enterprise Advisory Board, created under § 13-5-903;

The Mosaic Templars of America Center for African-American Culture and Business Enterprise, created under § 13-5-902;

The Old State House Commission, created under § 13-7-201; and

The State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission, created under § 15-11-201.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a cabinet-level department transfer under subsection (a) of this section includes all state entities under a state entity transferred to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism under subsection (a) of this section, including without limitation a division, office, program, or other unit of a state entity transferred to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism under subsection (a) of this section.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a state entity whose administrative functions have been transferred to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism under subsection (a) of this section shall otherwise continue to exercise the duties of the state entity under the administration of the cabinet-level Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism in the same manner as before the creation of the cabinet-level department.

The secretary may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to various divisions or employees of the department as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the department.

The secretary may, unless otherwise provided by law:

Hire department personnel;

Perform or assign duties assigned to the department; and

Serve as the director, or the administrative or executive head of any state entity under the administrative control of the department if the secretary meets all statutory requirements for the position.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5549.

25-43-1303. Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.

The executive head of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism shall be the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.

The secretary shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

Each division of the department shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the secretary.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5549.

25-43-1304. State Parks Division.

There is created a State Parks Division within the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.

The Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism may delegate any duties and responsibilities to the State Parks Division.

The Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism may employ a Director of the State Parks Division.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5549.

25-43-1305. Tourism Division.

There is created a Tourism Division within the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.

The Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism may delegate any duties and responsibilities to the division.

The secretary may employ a Director of the Tourism Division.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5549.

25-43-1306. Great River Road Division.

The Mississippi River Parkway Commission of Arkansas, as established pursuant to §27-69-201 et seq., shall be located in the Great River Road Division created hereby.

The Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, with the advice and consent of the Governor and the Chair of the Mississippi River Parkway Commission of Arkansas, shall appoint the head of the division.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5549.

25-43-1307. Payment of gratuities.

The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, which from time to time will use the services of hotels and restaurants for conferences, conventions, meetings, advertising promotions, news blitzes, and other group functions, is authorized to pay such reasonable charges of involuntary gratuities for group functions as a part of the cost of services.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5549.

25-43-1308. Extra help restriction.

No employee of the State Parks Division who is employed as extra help may receive an amount to exceed eighty-five percent (85%) of the maximum annual salary for a comparable position as authorized under the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, §21-5-201 et seq., during any fiscal year, nor shall such an employee be employed for a period of time to exceed one thousand eight hundred (1,800) hours in any single fiscal year.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5549.

Subchapter 14

— Department of Public Safety

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2020, No. 97, § 45, provided: “SHARED SERVICES.

“(a)(1)(A)The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal services and operating expenses by the Department of Public Safety.

“(B)Upon prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council, or if meeting in Legislative Session the Joint Budget Committee, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account appropriation section of this act and the transfer of positions to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

“(2)The transfer authority provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section for efficiencies and to eliminate duplication of services are limited only to those services that are provided for multiple divisions of a department, including without limitation to administration, human resources, procurement, communications, fleet operations, and information services.

“(3)The transfer authority provided to the department in subdivision (a)(1) of this section may be used to make transfers only within the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts authorized for the department.

“(b)(1)Each department utilizing the Shared Services Paying Account section or Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act shall submit a report to be included in the Budget Manuals for hearings, conducted by the General Assembly, listing all shared services transfers of positions, funds, and appropriation under this section, which shall be submitted as instructed by the Department of Finance and Administration — Office of Budget for uniformity.

“(2)A report submitted under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall include the following:

“(A)The position number, authorized position title, class code, grade, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the position being transferred to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act; and

“(B)The fund center, appropriation, appropriation amount, commitment item or items, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the fund or appropriation being transferred to the Shared Services Paying Account.

“(c)(1)It is the intent of the Ninety-Second General Assembly that the authority under this section to transfer positions is intended for use for the time period prior to Fiscal Year 2022 to allow cabinet-level departments to establish a centralized Regular Salaries — Shared Services section, with the recommendation that the position transfer authority granted under this section be discontinued after that time.

“(2)The Bureau of Legislative Research shall bring the recommendation in subdivision (c)(1) of this section to the attention of the chairs conducting the 2021 Regular Session pre-session budget hearings, the chairs of the Special Language Subcommittee, and the members of the Special Language Subcommittee during pre-session budget hearings.

“(d)Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a cabinet-level department each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by delineating the maximums in the appropriation act or acts and establishing authorized positions and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the cabinet-level departments created under Acts 2019, No. 910, may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided as authorized under this section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“(e)The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the date of passage through June 30, 2021”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

25-43-1401. Department of Public Safety.

There is created a Department of Public Safety as a cabinet-level department.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5733.

25-43-1402. State entities transferred to Department of Public Safety.

The administrative functions of the following state entities are transferred to the Department of Public Safety by a cabinet-level transfer:

The Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training, created under § 12-9-103;

The Arkansas Crime Information Center, created under § 12-12-201;

The Arkansas Emergency Telephone Services Board, created under § 12-10-318;

The Arkansas Homeland Security Advisory Group, created under §12-75-132;

The Arkansas State Police Commission, created under § 12-8-102;

The Child Abuse Hotline, created under § 12-18-301;

The Crimes Against Children Division, created under § 12-8-502;

The Crime Victims Reparations Board, created under § 16-90-705;

The Arkansas Department of Emergency Management, created under § 12-75-109, now known as the “Division of Emergency Management”;

The Department of Arkansas State Police, created under § 12-8-101, now known as the “Division of Arkansas State Police”;

The Law Enforcement Support Office, referenced under § 19-11-605;

The Office of Fire Protection Services, created under § 20-22-805;

The State Crime Laboratory, created under § 12-12-301;

The State Crime Laboratory Board, created under § 12-12-302;

The State Emergency Response Commission, created under §12-82-104;

The State Fire Prevention Commission, created under § 20-22-202; and

The Supervisory Board for the Arkansas Crime Information Center, created under § 12-12-202.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a cabinet-level department transfer under subsection (a) of this section includes all state entities under a state entity transferred to the Department of Public Safety under subsection (a) of this section, including without limitation a division, office, program, or other unit of a state entity transferred to the Department of Public Safety under subsection (a) of this section.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a state entity whose administrative functions have been transferred to the Department of Public Safety under subsection (a) of this section shall otherwise continue to exercise the duties of the state entity under the administration of the cabinet-level Department of Public Safety in the same manner as before the creation of the cabinet-level department.

The secretary may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to various divisions or employees of the department as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the department.

The secretary may, unless otherwise provided by law:

Hire department personnel;

Perform or assign duties assigned to the department; and

Serve as the director, or the administrative or executive head of any state entity under the administrative control of the department if the secretary also meets all statutory requirements for the position.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5733.

25-43-1403. Secretary of the Department of Public Safety.

The executive head of the Department of Public Safety shall be the Secretary of the Department of Public Safety.

The secretary shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

Each division of the department shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the secretary.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5733.

25-43-1404. Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training.

There is created within the Department of Public Safety the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
5733.

Subchapter 15

— Department of Transformation and Shared Services

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2020, No. 182, § 13, provided: “SHARED SERVICES.

“(a)(1)(A)The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal services and operating expenses by the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

“(B)Upon prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council, or if meeting in Legislative Session the Joint Budget Committee, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account appropriation section of this act and the transfer of positions to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

“(2)The transfer authority provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section for efficiencies and to eliminate duplication of services are limited only to those services that are provided for multiple divisions of a department, including without limitation to administration, human resources, procurement, communications, fleet operations, and information services.

“(3)The transfer authority provided to the department in subdivision (a)(1) of this section may be used to make transfers only within the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts authorized for the department.

“(b)(1)Each department utilizing the Shared Services Paying Account section or Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act shall submit a report to be included in the Budget Manuals for hearings, conducted by the General Assembly, listing all shared services transfers of positions, funds, and appropriation under this section, which shall be submitted as instructed by the Department of Finance and Administration — Office of Budget for uniformity.

“(2)A report submitted under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall include the following:

“(A)The position number, authorized position title, class code, grade, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the position being transferred to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act; and

“(B)The fund center, appropriation, appropriation amount, commitment item or items, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the fund or appropriation being transferred to the Shared Services Paying Account.

“(c)(1)It is the intent of the Ninety-Second General Assembly that the authority under this section to transfer positions is intended for use for the time period prior to Fiscal Year 2022 to allow cabinet-level departments to establish a centralized Regular Salaries — Shared Services section, with the recommendation that the position transfer authority granted under this section be discontinued after that time.

“(2)The Bureau of Legislative Research shall bring the recommendation in subdivision (c)(1) of this section to the attention of the chairs conducting the 2021 Regular Session pre-session budget hearings, the chairs of the Special Language Subcommittee, and the members of the Special Language Subcommittee during pre-session budget hearings.

“(d)Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a cabinet-level department each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by delineating the maximums in the appropriation act or acts and establishing authorized positions and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the cabinet-level departments created under Acts 2019, No. 910, may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided as authorized under this section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“(e)The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the date of passage through June 30, 2021”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

25-43-1501. Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

There is created the Department of Transformation and Shared Services as a cabinet-level department.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
6051.

25-43-1502. State entities transferred to Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

The administrative functions of the following state entities are transferred to the Department of Transformation and Shared Services by a cabinet-level department transfer:

The Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Board, created under § 15-21-503;

The Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Office, created under § 15-21-502;

The Building Authority Division, created under § 22-2-104;

The Data and Transparency Panel, created under § 25-4-127;

The Department of Information Systems, created under § 25-4-104, now to be known as the “Division of Information Systems”;

The Employee Benefits Division, created under § 25-43-1505;

The Office of Personnel Management, created under § 25-43-1504;

The Office of State Procurement, created under § 19-11-215;

The State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board, created under § 21-5-402; and

The State Technology Council, created under § 25-33-101.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a cabinet-level department transfer under subsection (a) of this section includes all state entities under a state entity transferred to the Department of Transformation and Shared Services under subsection (a) of this section, including without limitation a division, office, program, or other unit of a state entity transferred to the Department of Transformation and Shared Services under subsection (a) of this section.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a state entity whose administrative functions have been transferred to the Department of Transformation and Shared Services under subsection (a) of this section shall otherwise continue to exercise the duties of the state entity under the administration of the cabinet-level Department of Transformation and Shared Services in the same manner as before the creation of the cabinet-level department.

The secretary may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to various divisions or employees of the department as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the department.

The secretary may, unless otherwise provided by law:

Hire department personnel;

Perform or assign duties assigned to the department; and

Serve as the director, or the administrative or executive head, of any state entity under the administrative control of the department if the secretary also meets all statutory requirements for the position.

The State Personnel Administrator shall be employed by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services with the advice and consent of the Governor.

The office shall be under the overall direction, control, and supervision of the secretary.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
6051.

25-43-1503. Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

The executive head of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall be the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

The secretary shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

Each division of the department shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the secretary.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
6051.

25-43-1504. Office of Personnel Management — State Personnel Administrator.

There is created within the Department of Transformation and Shared Services the Office of Personnel Management.

(1)(A)The Director of the Office of Personnel Management shall be known as the “State Personnel Administrator”.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
6051.

25-43-1505. Employee Benefits Division.

There is created within the Department of Transformation and Shared Services the Employee Benefits Division.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
6051.

Subchapter 16

— Department of Veterans Affairs

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

25-43-1601. Department of Veterans Affairs — Creation.

There is created the Department of Veterans Affairs as a cabinet-level department.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
6327.

25-43-1602. State entities transferred to Department of Veterans Affairs.

The administrative functions of the following state entities are transferred to the Department of Veterans Affairs pursuant to a cabinet-level department transfer:

The Arkansas Veterans' Child Welfare Service, created under § 20-81-101;

The Arkansas Veterans' Commission, created under § 20-81-104;

The county veterans' service officer programs, created under § 20-81-106;

The Department of Veterans Affairs, created under § 20-81-102 [repealed];

The state veterans' cemetery system, created under § 20-81-112; and

The Veterans' Home, established under § 20-81-105, now known as “veterans' homes”.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a cabinet-level department transfer under subsection (a) of this section includes all state entities under a state entity transferred to the Department of Veterans Affairs under subsection (a) of this section, including without limitation a division, office, program, or other unit of a state entity transferred to the Department of Veterans Affairs under subsection (a) of this section.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a state entity whose administrative functions have been transferred to the Department of Veterans Affairs under subsection (a) of this section shall otherwise continue to exercise the duties of the state entity under the administration of the cabinet-level Department of Veterans Affairs in the same manner as before the creation of the cabinet-level department.

Supervise the operation of the veterans' homes under § 20-81-105;

Supervise the activities, training, and testing of the county veterans' service officers located throughout the State of Arkansas; and

Perform all administrative functions for the state entities under the administration of the department.

The secretary may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to various divisions or employees of the department as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the department.

The secretary may, unless otherwise provided by law:

Hire department personnel;

Perform or assign duties assigned to the department; and

Serve as the director, or the administrative or executive head of any state entity under the administrative control of the department if the secretary also meets all statutory requirements for the position.

The Governor may appoint a qualified secretary who has:

Served in the United States Armed Forces during a period of conflict as defined by the United States Congress;

Been honorably discharged from the United States Armed Forces; and

Been a resident of the State of Arkansas for two (2) or more years preceding his or her appointment.

The secretary shall promote and supervise the dissemination of available information concerning the rights of veterans and their dependents.

The secretary may establish, maintain, and operate district offices within the State of Arkansas as may be necessary.

The secretary may employ other employees, full-time or part-time, as may be determined necessary, within the limits of the funds appropriated for that purpose.

An employee under the supervision of the department shall not accept, receive, or charge any money, article, or thing of value for the performance of any service rendered to any veteran or his or her dependents at any time or in any manner.

Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
6327.

25-43-1603. Powers and duties of Department of Veterans Affairs.

The Department of Veterans Affairs shall:

The department is authorized to develop and promulgate all rules necessary for the enforcement and implementation of the provisions of the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019 and all applicable federal rules and regulations.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
6327.

25-43-1604. Secretary of the Department of Veterans Affairs.

The executive head of the Department of Veterans Affairs shall be the Secretary of the Department of Veterans Affairs.

The secretary shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

Each division of the department shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the secretary.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
6327.

25-43-1605. Veterans service officers.

The Secretary of the Department of Veterans Affairs may employ veterans service officers, full-time or part-time, as may be determined necessary, within the limits of the funds appropriated for that purpose.

(1)A veterans service officer shall have served in the United States Armed Forces and shall have been honorably discharged from the United States Armed Forces.

All veterans service officers of the Department of Veterans Affairs shall have knowledge of all laws, both federal and state, relating to the rights and benefits of all veterans and their dependents and shall aid and assist all veterans and their dependents in securing their rights and benefits.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
6327.